Utah statutes.
4-16-9.   Designation of official testing agency for certification of seed.
The agricultural experiment station at Utah State University is designated as
the official state agency responsible for the production, approval, and
testing of foundation seeds in this state. This agency shall perform all
functions necessary for seed certification including the determination of the
adaptability of established and new crop varieties for planting in this state,
whether produced in this state or elsewhere and the determination of
eligibility of crop varieties for registration and certification in the state.
In performing its responsibility, the experiment station may contract, subject
to available funds, upon such terms and conditions as it deems appropriate
with a private seed certifying agency.
